Georgia, session 2025_26, HB788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to create a board of elections and registration for Macon County and to provide for
its powers and duties, approved June 3, 2003 (Ga. L. 2003, p. 4532), as amended, particularly
H. B. 788
- 1 -

LC 47 3597/AP
by an Act approved June 30, 2020 (Ga. L. 2020, p. 3946), is amended by revising Sections 4
and 5 as follows:
"SECTION 4.
The board shall appoint a person to serve as the chief election supervisor of Macon County.
Such position shall be part time or full time as determined by the board and such person
shall be paid a salary to be set by the board and payable from county funds. The chief
election supervisor shall generally direct and control the administration of elections and
voter registration in Macon County. The board shall supervise the election related duties
of the chief election supervisor and all other election employees or staff. For all other
matters the chief election supervisor and election employees or staff shall be subject to the
supervision of the county manager. The chief election supervisor shall be subject to
removal from office by the board, with or without cause; provided, however, that the
county manager may recommend that the board remove the chief election supervisor for
deficiencies in the performance of nonelection related duties. The chief election supervisor
shall not be a member of the board nor an elected official.
SECTION 5.
Each member of the board shall:
(1) Serve for a term of four years and until a successor is appointed and qualified;
(2) Be eligible to be reappointed to succeed himself or herself and shall have the right
to resign at any time by giving written notice of such resignation to the commissioners
and to the clerk of the Superior Court of Macon County;
(3) Be subject to removal from the board at any time for cause, after notice and hearing,
by the chief judge of the Superior Court of Macon County;
(4) Not engage in political activity on behalf of any candidate, which shall include, but
not be limited to:
H. B. 788
- 2 -

LC 47 3597/AP
(A) Distributing campaign literature;
(B) Engaging in any communication that advocates or criticizes a candidate or an
officeholder, including but not limited to social media; and
(C) Wearing badges, buttons, or clothing with partisan messages or displaying political
signage on vehicles if the signage is visible from or parked within 150 feet of the board
office or a designated polling place."
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising Sections 7 and 8 as follows:
"SECTION 7.
In the event a vacancy occurs in the office of any member before the expiration of a term
by reason of removal, death, resignation, or otherwise, the appointing authority which is
required under Section 3 of this Act to make the appointment to the office upon expiration
of the term shall appoint a successor to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term in the
manner set forth in Section 3 of this Act.
SECTION 8.
Before entering upon the duties of office, each member shall take substantially the same
oath as required by law for county registrars and shall have the same privileges from
arrest."
SECTION 3.
Said Act is further amended by revising Section 15 as follows:
H. B. 788
- 3 -

LC 47 3597/AP
"SECTION 15.
(a) The board shall fix and establish by appropriate resolution entered on its minutes
directives governing the execution of matters within its jurisdiction. The board shall hold
meetings at the county courthouse, at the courthouse annex, or at the place of meeting of
the commissioners no less than monthly. Any specially called meetings must be approved
by a majority vote of the board and shall be held only after the notification of the time and
place of the holding of such meeting has been communicated in writing to the chief
election supervisor to provide public notice of the meeting as required by law. All
meetings of whatever kind of the board shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 14 of Title
50 of the O.C.G.A., relating to open meetings.
(b) The board shall maintain minutes of its meetings and a written record of policy
decisions that shall be amended to include additions or deletions. Such minutes and written
record shall be subject to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 of the O.C.G.A., relating to
inspection of public records."
SECTION 4.
Said Act is further amended by revising subsection (b) of Section 16 as follows:
"(b) The members of the board shall receive compensation, in an amount determined by
the governing authority of the county, for their service as members of the board and shall
also be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of
their duties."
SECTION 5.
Said Act is further amended by revising Section 17 as follows:
H. B. 788
- 4 -

LC 47 3597/AP
"SECTION 17.
Subject to appropriation of funds by the commissioners, the board shall be authorized to
expend county funds to provide for such proper and suitable administrative offices and for
such clerical assistance and other employees as the board shall deem appropriate.
Compensation for such administrative personnel shall be paid by the board under the
county personnel system wholly from county funds. This section shall not be construed
so as to require the board to expend any funds simply because they are authorized to do so
under this Act. Employees of the board shall be considered county employees for pay,
benefits, sick leave, vacation, and for other purposes, and such pay shall be as determined
by the governing authority of the county."
SECTION 6.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 788
- 5 -